California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(1) (A) Waiver of its lien against (i) any parcel of real property security that is environmentally impaired or is an affected parcel, and (ii) all or any portion of the fixtures and personal property attached to the parcels; and

(B) Exercise of (i) the rights and remedies of an unsecured creditor, including reduction of its claim against the borrower to judgment, and (ii) any other
 rights and remedies permitted by law.

(2) Exercise of (i) the rights and remedies of a creditor secured by a deed of trust or mortgage and, if applicable, a lien against fixtures or personal property attached to the real property security, and (ii) any other rights and remedies permitted by law.

(b) Before the secured lender may waive its lien against any parcel of real property security pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) on the basis of the environmental impairment contemplated by paragraph (3) of subdivision (e), (i) the secured lender shall provide written notice of the default to the borrower, and (ii) the value of the subject real property security shall be established and its environmentally impaired status shall be confirmed by an order of a court of competent jurisdiction in an action brought by the secured lender against the borrower. The complaint for a
 valuation and confirmation action may include causes of action for a money judgment for all or part of the secured obligation, in which case the waiver of the secured lender’s liens under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall result only if and when a final money judgment is obtained against the borrower.

(c) If a secured lender elects the rights and remedies permitted by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and the borrower’s obligations are also secured by other real property security, fixtures, or personal property, the secured lender shall first foreclose against the additional collateral to the extent required by applicable law in which case the amount of the judgment of the secured lender pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be limited to the extent Section 580a or 580d, or subdivision (b) of Section 726 apply to the foreclosures of additional real property security. The borrower may waive or modify the foreclosure requirements
 of this subdivision provided that the waiver or modification is in writing and signed by the borrower after default.

(d) Subdivision (a) shall be inapplicable if all of the following are true:

(1) The release or threatened release was not knowingly or negligently caused or contributed to, or knowingly or willfully permitted or acquiesced to, by any of the following:

(A) The borrower or any related party.

(B) Any affiliate or agent of the borrower or any related party.

(2) In conjunction with the making, renewal, or modification of the loan, extension of credit, guaranty, or other obligation secured by the real property security, neither the borrower, any related party, nor any affiliate or
 agent of either the borrower or any related party had actual knowledge or notice of the release or threatened release, or if a person had knowledge or notice of the release or threatened release, the borrower made written disclosure thereof to the secured lender after the secured lender’s written request for information concerning the environmental condition of the real property security, or the secured lender otherwise obtained actual knowledge thereof, prior to the making, renewal, or modification of the obligation.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Affected parcel” means any portion of a parcel of real property security that is (A) contiguous to the environmentally impaired parcel, even if separated by roads, streets, utility easements, or railroad rights-of-way, (B) part of an approved or proposed subdivision within the meaning of Section 66424 of the Government Code, of
 which the environmentally impaired parcel is also a part, or (C) within 2,000 feet of the environmentally impaired parcel.

(2) “Borrower” means the trustor under a deed of trust, or a mortgagor under a mortgage, where the deed of trust or mortgage encumbers real property security and secures the performance of the trustor or mortgagor under a loan, extension of credit, guaranty, or other obligation. The term includes any successor-in-interest of the trustor or mortgagor to the real property security before the deed of trust or mortgage has been discharged, reconveyed, or foreclosed upon.

(3) “Environmentally impaired” means that the estimated costs to clean up and remediate a past or present release or threatened release of any hazardous substance into, onto, beneath, or from the real property security, not disclosed in writing to, or otherwise actually known by, the secured
 lender prior to the making of the loan or extension of credit secured by the real property security, exceeds 25 percent of the higher of the aggregate fair market value of all security for the loan or extension of credit (A) at the time of the making of the loan or extension of credit, or (B) at the time of the discovery of the release or threatened release by the secured lender. For purposes of this definition, the estimated cost to clean up and remediate the contamination caused by the release or threatened release shall include only those costs that would be incurred reasonably and in good faith, and fair market value shall be determined without giving consideration to the release or threatened release, and shall be exclusive of the amount of all liens and encumbrances against the security that are senior in priority to the lien of the secured lender. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the real property security for any loan or extension of credit secured by a single parcel of real property which is included
 in the National Priorities List pursuant to Section 9605 of Title 42 of the United States Code, or in any list published by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to Section 78760 of the Health and Safety Code, shall be deemed to be environmentally impaired.

(4) “Hazardous substance” means any of the following:

(A) Any “hazardous substance” as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 25281 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Any “waste” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 13050 of the Water Code.

(C) Petroleum, including crude oil or any fraction thereof, natural gas, natural gas liquids, liquefied natural gas, or synthetic gas usable for fuel, or any mixture thereof.

(5) “Real property security” means any real property and improvements, other than a separate interest and any related interest in the common area of a residential common interest development, as the terms “separate interest,” “common area,” and “common interest development” are defined in Sections 4095, 4100, and 4185 of the Civil Code, or real property which contains only 1 to 15 dwelling units, which in either case (A) is solely used (i) for residential purposes, or (ii) if reasonably contemplated by the parties to the deed of trust or mortgage, for residential purposes as well as limited agricultural or commercial purposes incidental thereto, and (B) is the subject of an issued certificate of occupancy unless the dwelling is to be owned and occupied by the borrower.

(6) “Related party” means any person who shares an ownership interest with the borrower in the real property security, or is a partner or joint venturer with the
 borrower in a partnership or joint venture, the business of which includes the acquisition, development, use, lease, or sale of the real property security.

(7) “Release” means any spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring, emitting, emptying, discharging, injecting, escaping, leaching, dumping, or disposing into the environment, including continuing migration, of hazardous substances into, onto, or through soil, surface water, or groundwater. The term does not include actions directly relating to the incorporation in a lawful manner of building materials into a permanent improvement to the real property security.

(8) “Secured lender” means the beneficiary under a deed of trust against the real property security, or the mortgagee under a mortgage against the real property security, and any successor-in-interest of the beneficiary or mortgagee to the deed of trust or mortgage.

(f) This section shall not be construed to invalidate or otherwise affect in any manner any rights or obligations arising under contract in connection with a loan or extension of credit, including, without limitation, provisions limiting recourse.

(g) This section shall only apply to loans, extensions of credit, guaranties, or other obligations secured by real property security made, renewed, or modified on or after January 1, 1992.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 8.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------

727.

If there be surplus money remaining, after payment of the amount due on the mortgage, lien, or incumbrance, with costs, the Court may cause the same to be paid to the person entitled to it, and in the meantime may direct it to be deposited in Court.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

728.

If the debt for which the mortgage, lien, or incumbrance is held is not all due, so soon as sufficient of the property has been sold to pay the amount due, with costs, the sale must cease; and afterwards, as often as more becomes due, for principal or interest, the Court may, on motion, order more to be sold. But if the property cannot be sold in portions, without injury to the parties, the whole may be ordered to be sold in the first instance, and the entire debt and costs paid, there being a rebate of interest where such rebate is proper.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

729.010.

(a) If the decree of foreclosure of a mortgage or deed of trust on real property pursuant to Section 726 determines that a deficiency judgment may be ordered against the defendant, the real property (other than a leasehold estate with an unexpired term of less than two years at the time of levy) shall be sold subject to the right of redemption.

(b) If the property is to be sold subject to the right of redemption, the sale is governed by Section 716.020, except that:

(1) The notice of sale of the
 property shall state that the property will be sold subject to the right of redemption and shall state the amount of the secured indebtedness with interest and costs.

(2) Notice of sale may be given upon entry of the judgment for sale of the property and the provision of Section 701.545 delaying notice of sale does not apply.

(3) Notice of sale may be given to persons having liens on the property upon entry of the judgment for sale of the property and the provision of subdivision (h) of Section 701.540 delaying such notice does not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 48.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

729.020.

Property sold subject to the right of redemption may be redeemed only by the judgment debtor or the judgment debtor’s successor in interest. For the purpose of this article, the purchaser of the property at the foreclosure sale is not a successor in interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 49.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

729.030.

The redemption period during which property may be redeemed from a foreclosure sale under this chapter ends:

(a) Three months after the date of sale if the proceeds of the sale are sufficient to satisfy the secured indebtedness with interest and costs of action and of sale.

(b) One year after the date of sale if the proceeds of the sale are not sufficient to satisfy the secured indebtedness with interest and costs of action and of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 50.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

729.035.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the sale of a separate interest in a common interest development is subject to the right of redemption within 90 days after the sale if the sale arises from a foreclosure by the association of a common interest development pursuant to Sections 5700, 5710, and 5735 of the Civil Code, subject to the conditions of Sections 5705, 5715, and 5720 of the Civil
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 46.   (AB 806)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 86 of Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

729.040.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 701.660, when the purchaser of an interest in real property sold subject to the right of redemption pays the amount due, the levying officer conducting the sale shall execute and deliver a certificate of sale to the purchaser and record a duplicate of the certificate of sale in the office of the county recorder.

(b) The certificate of sale shall contain either:

(1) In the case of a
 judicial foreclosure, the information required by Section 701.670.

(2) In the case of a nonjudicial foreclosure, all of the information required by subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 701.670.

(c) In addition to the information required by subdivision (b), the certificate of sale shall also contain the following:

(1) The price paid for each distinct lot or parcel of real property sold subject to the right of redemption.

(2) The total price paid.

(3) A statement that the property is subject to the right of redemption, indicating the applicable redemption period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 575, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

729.050.

If property is sold subject to the right of redemption, promptly after the sale the levying officer or trustee who conducted the sale shall serve notice of the right of redemption on the judgment debtor. Service shall be made personally or by mail. The notice of the right of redemption shall indicate the applicable redemption period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 575, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

729.060.

(a) A person who seeks to redeem the property shall deposit the redemption price with the levying officer who conducted the sale before the expiration of the redemption period. If a successor in interest to the judgment debtor seeks to redeem the property, the successor in interest shall, at the time the redemption price is deposited, file with the levying officer either (1) a certified copy of a recorded conveyance or (2) a copy of an assignment or any other evidence of the interest verified by an affidavit of the successor in interest or of a subscribing witness thereto.

(b) The redemption price is the total of the following amounts, less any offset allowed under subdivision (c).

(1) The purchase price at the sale.

(2) The amount of any assessments or taxes and reasonable amounts for fire insurance, maintenance, upkeep, and repair of improvements on the property.

(3) Any amount paid by the purchaser on a prior obligation secured by the property to the extent that the payment was necessary for the protection of the purchaser’s interest.

(4) Interest on the amounts described in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) at the rate of interest on money judgments from the time such amount was paid until the date the deposit is made.

(5) If the purchaser at the
 sale has any liens subordinate to the lien under which the property was sold, the amount of the purchaser’s lien, plus interest at the rate of interest on money judgments from the date of the sale until the date the deposit is made.

(c) Rents and profits from the property paid to the purchaser or the value of the use and occupation of the property to the purchaser may be offset against the amounts described in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 538, Sec. 32.5.)
-------------------------------------------

729.070.

(a) If the purchaser and the person seeking to redeem the property disagree on the redemption price or as to whether the person is entitled to redeem the property, or if the purchaser refuses the tender of the redemption price pursuant to Section 729.080, the person seeking to redeem may file a petition with the court for an order determining the redemption price or whether the person is entitled to redeem the property. The petition shall be filed before the expiration of the redemption period. At the time the petition is filed, the
 petitioner shall deposit the undisputed amount of the redemption price with the levying officer, if deposit has not previously been made, and give written notice to the levying officer or trustee of the filing of the petition.

(b) The petition shall be in writing and shall include the following statements:

(1) The amounts demanded to which the person seeking to redeem objects and the reasons for the objection.

(2) Any amounts offset to which the purchaser objects and the justification for the offset.

(3) The status of the petitioner that qualifies the petitioner to redeem the property. A copy of the papers required by subdivision (a) of Section 729.060 shall be filed with the petition.

(c) The hearing on the petition shall be held not later than 20 days after the date the petition was filed unless continued by the court for good cause.

(d) Not less than 10 days before the hearing, the person seeking to redeem the property shall personally serve on the purchaser a copy of the petition together with a notice of the time and place of the hearing.

(e) At the hearing on the petition, the person seeking to redeem the property has the burden of proof.

(f) At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall determine by order the amount required to redeem the property. The determination shall be made upon affidavit or evidence satisfactory to the court.

(g) If an amount in addition to that deposited with the levying officer is
 required to redeem the property, the person seeking to redeem shall, within 10 days after the issuance of the order, pay the additional amount to the levying officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 575, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

729.080.

(a) If the redemption price is not deposited pursuant to Section 729.060 before the expiration of the redemption period, or if no additional deposit is made pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 729.070 before the expiration of the time provided, the levying officer who conducted the sale shall promptly execute and deliver to the purchaser a deed of sale that complies with the requirements of Section 701.670, or the nonjudicial foreclosure trustee pursuant to Section 729.035 shall deliver an executed trustee’s deed and comply with the
 requirements of Section 2924j of the Civil Code.

(b) If the person seeking to redeem the property deposits the redemption price pursuant to Section 729.060 or 729.070 during the redemption period, the levying officer shall tender the deposit to the purchaser. If the purchaser accepts the tender or if the redemption price determined by court order is tendered, the levying officer or trustee shall promptly execute and deliver a certificate of redemption to the person seeking to redeem and shall immediately record a duplicate of the certificate in the office of the recorder of the county where the property is located.

(c) Tender of the redemption price determined by court order or agreed upon by the purchaser and the person seeking to redeem the property is equivalent to payment. If the tender is refused, the levying officer shall deposit the amount tendered with the county treasurer
 of the county where the property is located, payable to the order of the purchaser. If the amount deposited is not claimed by the purchaser, or the legal representative of the purchaser, within five years after the deposit is made, by making application to the treasurer or other official designated by the county, it shall be paid into the general fund of the county.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e), upon redemption the effect of the sale is terminated and the person who redeemed the property is restored to the estate therein sold at the sale.

(e) Liens extinguished by the sale, as provided in Section 701.630, do not reattach to the property after redemption, and the property that was subject to the extinguished lien may not be applied to the satisfaction of the claim or judgment under which the lien was created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 575, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

729.090.

(a) From the time of the sale until a redemption, the purchaser is entitled to receive from the person in possession the rents and profits from the property or the value of the use and occupation of the property.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the purchaser is liable to the person who redeems for any rents or profits that have been received by the purchaser pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The purchaser, from the time of sale until redemption, is entitled to enter the property during reasonable
 hours to repair and maintain the premises and is entitled to an order restraining waste on the property from the court. Such order may be granted with or without notice in the discretion of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 56.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

730.

In all cases of foreclosure of mortgage the attorney’s fee shall be fixed by the court in which the proceedings are had, any stipulation in the mortgage to the contrary notwithstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

730.5.

Except as otherwise provided by Section 9604 of the Commercial Code, none of the provisions of this chapter or of Section 580a, 580b, 580c, or 580d applies to any security interest in personal property or fixtures governed by the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Actions for Nuisance, Waste,and Willful Trespass, in Certain Cases,on Real Property [731. - 736.]

731.

An action may be brought by any person whose property is injuriously affected, or whose personal enjoyment is lessened by a nuisance, as defined in Section 3479 of the Civil Code, and by the judgment in that action the nuisance may be enjoined or abated as well as damages recovered therefor. A civil action may be brought in the name of the people of the State of California to abate a public nuisance, as defined in Section 3480
 of the Civil Code, by the district attorney or county counsel of any county in which the nuisance exists, or by the city attorney of any town or city in which the nuisance exists. Each of those officers shall have concurrent right to bring an action for a public nuisance existing within a town or city. The district attorney, county counsel, or city attorney of any county or city in which the nuisance exists shall bring an action whenever directed by the board of supervisors of the county, or whenever directed by the legislative authority of the town or city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 570, Sec. 2.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

731a.

Whenever any city, city and county, or county shall have established zones or districts under authority of law wherein certain manufacturing or commercial or airport uses are expressly permitted, except in an action to abate a public nuisance brought in the name of the people of the State of California, no person or persons, firm or corporation shall be enjoined or restrained by the injunctive process from the reasonable and necessary operation in any such industrial or commercial zone or airport of any use expressly permitted therein, nor shall such use be deemed a nuisance without evidence of the employment of unnecessary and injurious methods of operation. Nothing in
 this act shall be deemed to apply to the regulation and working hours of canneries, fertilizing plants, refineries and other similar establishments whose operation produce offensive odors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 795.)
-------------------------------------------

731b.

In any action or proceeding to abate the use of an airport or an airpark, proof that the airport or airpark has been in existence for three years constitutes a rebuttable presumption which shall be prima facie evidence that the operation of the airport or airpark does not constitute a nuisance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

731c.

Injury to formations bearing oil or gas or to oil or gas wells caused by the subsurface migration of any substance as a result of secondary recovery operations for oil or gas conducted in accordance with good oilfield practices shall not be grounds for enjoining the secondary recovery operations if an undertaking is given for the payment of any compensable damages to which the owners of interests in the formations or wells may be entitled resulting from the injury. Any benefit to the injured property from the secondary recovery operation shall be considered in mitigation of damages for the injury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

731.5.

Whenever any person unlawfully closes any public trail, any person who uses such trail or would use such trail, and any association, corporation or other entity whose membership as a whole is adversely affected by such closure may bring an action to enjoin such closure.

The prevailing party in such action shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorney’s fees, in addition to court costs.

As used in this section, a public trail is any trail to which the public in general has a right of access, which right is established pursuant to a recorded document conveying to a political corporation
 or governmental agency, specifying the nature of such public trail, specifically describing the location thereof, and naming the record owners of the real property over which such trail exists if created by a license, permit or easement. It includes, but is not limited to, pedestrian, equestrian, and boating trails, but does not include any public street, road, or highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

732.

If a guardian, conservator, tenant for life or years, joint tenant, or tenant in common of real property, commit waste thereon, any person aggrieved by the waste may bring an action against him therefor, in which action there may be judgment for treble damages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

733.

Any person who cuts down or carries off any wood or underwood, tree, or timber, or girdles or otherwise injures any tree or timber on the land of another person, or on the street or highway in front of any person’s house, village, or city lot, or cultivated grounds; or on the commons or public grounds of any city or town, or on the street or highway in front thereof, without lawful authority, is liable to the owner of such land, or to such city or town, for treble the amount of damages which may be assessed therefor, in a civil action, in any Court having jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

734.

Nothing in the last section authorizes the recovery of more than the just value of the timber taken from uncultivated woodland for the repair of a public highway or bridge upon the land, or adjoining it.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

735.

If a person recover damages for a forcible or unlawlful entry in or upon, or detention of any building or any cultivated real property, judgment may be entered for three times the amount at which the actual damages are assessed.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

736.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a secured lender may bring an action for breach of contract against a borrower for breach of any environmental provision made by the borrower relating to the real property security, for the recovery of damages, and for the enforcement of the environmental provision, and that action or failure to foreclose first against collateral shall not constitute an
 action within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 726, or constitute a money judgment for a deficiency or a deficiency judgment within the meaning of Section 580a, 580b, or 580d, or subdivision (b) of Section 726. No injunction for the enforcement of an environmental provision may be issued after (1) the obligation secured by the real property security has been fully satisfied, or (2) all of the borrower’s rights, title, and interest in and to the real property security has been transferred in a bona fide transaction to an unaffiliated third party for fair value.

(b) The damages a secured lender may recover pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be limited to reimbursement or indemnification of the following:

(1) If not pursuant to an order of any federal, state, or local governmental agency relating to the cleanup, remediation, or other response action required by applicable
 law, those costs relating to a reasonable and good faith cleanup, remediation, or other response action concerning a release or threatened release of hazardous substances which is anticipated by the environmental provision.

(2) If pursuant to an order of any federal, state, or local governmental agency relating to the cleanup, remediation, or other response action required by applicable law which is anticipated by the environmental provision, all amounts reasonably advanced in good faith by the secured lender in connection therewith, provided that the secured lender negotiated, or attempted to negotiate, in good faith to minimize the amounts it was required to advance under the order.

(3) Indemnification against all liabilities of the secured lender to any third party relating to the breach and not arising from acts, omissions, or other conduct which occur after the borrower is no
 longer an owner or operator of the real property security, and provided the secured lender is not responsible for the environmentally impaired condition of the real property security in accordance with the standards set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 726.5. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “owner or operator” means those persons described in Section 101(20)(A) of the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, as amended (42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601, et seq.).

(4) Attorneys’ fees and costs incurred by the secured lender relating to the breach.

The damages a secured lender may recover pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not include (i) any part of the principal amount or accrued interest of the secured obligation, except for any amounts advanced by the secured lender to cure or mitigate the breach of the environmental provision that are added to the principal
 amount, and contractual interest thereon, or (ii) amounts which relate to a release which was knowingly permitted, caused, or contributed to by the secured lender or any affiliate or agent of the secured lender.

(c) A secured lender may not recover damages against a borrower pursuant to subdivision (a) for amounts advanced or obligations incurred for the cleanup or other remediation of real property security, and related attorneys’ fees and costs, if all of the following are true:

(1) The original principal amount of, or commitment for, the loan or other obligation secured by the real property security did not exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).

(2) In conjunction with the secured lender’s acceptance of the environmental provision, the secured lender agreed in writing to accept the real property security
 on the basis of a completed environmental site assessment and other relevant information from the borrower.

(3) The borrower did not permit, cause, or contribute to the release or threatened release.

(4) The deed of trust or mortgage covering the real property security has not been discharged, reconveyed, or foreclosed upon.

(d) This section is not intended to establish, abrogate, modify, limit, or otherwise affect any cause of action other than that provided by subdivision (a) that a secured lender may have against a borrower under an environmental provision.

(e) This section shall apply only to environmental provisions contracted in conjunction with loans, extensions of credit, guaranties, or other obligations made, renewed, or modified on or after
 January 1, 1992. Notwithstanding the foregoing, this section shall not be construed to validate, invalidate, or otherwise affect in any manner the rights and obligations of the parties to, or the enforcement of, environmental provisions contracted before January 1, 1992.

(f) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Borrower” means the trustor under a deed of trust, or a mortgagor under a mortgage, where the deed of trust or mortgage encumbers real property security and secures the performance of the trustor or mortgagor under a loan, extension of credit, guaranty, or other obligation. The term includes any successor-in-interest of the trustor or mortgagor to the real property security before the deed of trust or mortgage has been discharged, reconveyed, or foreclosed upon.

(2) “Environmental provision” means any written
 representation, warranty, indemnity, promise, or covenant relating to the existence, location, nature, use, generation, manufacture, storage, disposal, handling, or past, present, or future release or threatened release, of any hazardous substance into, onto, beneath, or from the real property security, or to past, present, or future compliance with any law relating thereto, made by a borrower in conjunction with the making, renewal, or modification of a loan, extension of credit, guaranty, or other obligation involving the borrower, whether or not the representation, warranty, indemnity, promise, or covenant is or was contained in or secured by the deed of trust or mortgage, and whether or not the deed of trust or mortgage has been discharged, reconveyed, or foreclosed upon.

(3) “Hazardous substance” means any of the following:

(A) Any “hazardous substance” as defined in
 subdivision (h) of Section 25281 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Any “waste” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 13050 of the Water Code.

(C) Petroleum, including crude oil or any fraction thereof, natural gas, natural gas liquids, liquefied natural gas, or synthetic gas usable for fuel, or any mixture thereof.

(4) “Real property security” means any real property and improvements, other than a separate interest and any related interest in the common area of a residential common interest development, as the terms “separate interest,” “common area,” and “common interest development” are defined in Sections 4095, 4100, and 4185 of the Civil Code, or real property which contains only 1 to 15 dwelling units, which in either case (A) is solely used (i) for residential purposes, or (ii) if reasonably contemplated by
 the parties to the deed of trust or mortgage, for residential purposes as well as limited agricultural or commercial purposes incidental thereto, and (B) is the subject of an issued certificate of occupancy unless the dwelling is to be owned and occupied by the borrower.

(5) “Release” means any spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring, emitting, emptying, discharging, injecting, escaping, leaching, dumping, or disposing into the environment, including continuing migration, of hazardous substances into, onto, or through soil, surface water, or groundwater. The term does not include actions directly relating to the incorporation in a lawful manner of building materials into a permanent improvement to the real property security.

(6) “Secured lender” means the beneficiary under a deed of trust against the real property security, or the mortgagee under a mortgage against the real property
 security, and any successor-in-interest of the beneficiary or mortgagee to the deed of trust or mortgage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 47.   (AB 806)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 86 of Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Actions for the Recovery of Real Property, and Other Provisions Relating to Actions Concerning Real Property [740. - 749.5.]

740.

In an action for the recovery of property, where the plaintiff shows a right to recover at the time the action was commenced, but it appears that his right has terminated during the pendency of the action, the verdict and judgment must be according to the fact, and the plaintiff may recover damages for withholding the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1907, Ch. 363.)
-------------------------------------------

741.

(a) As used in this section, “good faith improver” has the meaning given that term by Section 871.1.

(b) When damages are claimed for withholding the property recovered, and improvements have been made on the property by a defendant or his predecessor in interest as a good faith improver, the amount by which such improvements enhance the value of the land must be allowed as a setoff against such damages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 150.)
-------------------------------------------

742.

The Court in which an action is pending for the recovery of real property, or for damages for an injury thereto, or a Judge thereof may, on motion, upon notice by either party for good cause shown, grant an order allowing to such party the right to enter upon the property and make survey and measurement thereof, and of any tunnels, shafts, or drifts therein, for the purpose of the action, even though entry for such purpose has to be made through other lands belonging to parties to the action.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

743.

The order must describe the property, and a copy thereof must be served on the owner or occupant; and thereupon such party may enter upon the property, with necessary surveyors and assistants, and make such survey and measurement; but if any unnecessary injury be done to the property he is liable therefor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

744.

A mortgage of real property shall not be deemed a conveyance, whatever its terms, so as to enable the owner of the mortgage to recover possession of the real property without a foreclosure and sale.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

745.

The court may, by injunction, on good cause shown, restrain the party in possession from doing any act to the injury of real property:

(a) During the foreclosure of a mortgage on the property.

(b) After levy on the property and before the possession of the property is transferred pursuant to sale under the levy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 57.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

746.
